North Carolina statutes. Chapter 135. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; Social Security; State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
Article 1. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees.
§ 135-1.
Definitions. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The following words and phrases as used in this Chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, shall have the following meanings:

“Accumulated contributions” shall mean the sum of all the amounts deducted from the compensation of a member and accredited to his individual account in the annuity savings fund, together with regular interest thereon as provided in

G.S. 135-8

.

“Actuarial equivalent” shall mean a benefit of equal value when computed upon the basis of actuarial assumptions as shall be adopted by the Board of Trustees.

“Annuity” shall mean payments for life derived from that “accumulated contribution” of a member. All annuities shall be payable in equal monthly installments.

“Annuity reserve” shall mean the present value of all payments to be made on account of any annuity or benefit in lieu of any annuity, computed upon the basis of such mortality tables as shall be adopted by the Board of Trustees, and regular interest.

(4a)
“Authorized representatives who are assisting the Retirement Systems Division staff” means only other staff of the Department of State Treasurer, staff of the Department of Justice, or persons providing internal
auditing assistance required under G.S. 143-746(b).

(4b)
Expired pursuant to Session Laws 2021-72, s. 2.1(d), effective July 1, 2022.

“Average final compensation” shall mean the average annual compensation of a member during the four consecutive calendar years of membership service producing the highest such average; but shall not include any compensation, as determined by the Board
of Trustees, for the reimbursement of expenses or payments for housing or any other allowances whether or not classified as salary and wages. Payout of vacation leave shall be included in “average final compensation” only if the
payout is received by the member during the four consecutive calendar years of membership service producing the highest average annual compensation of the member. In the event a member is or has been in receipt of a benefit under
the provisions of

G.S. 135-105

or

G.S. 135-106

, the compensation used in the calculation of “average final compensation” shall be the higher of compensation of the member under the provisions of this Article or compensation used in calculating the payment of
benefits under Article 6 of this Chapter as adjusted for percentage increases in the post disability benefit.

“Beneficiary” shall mean any person in receipt of a pension, an annuity, a retirement allowance or other benefit as provided by this Chapter.

“Board of Trustees” shall mean the Board provided for in

G.S. 135-6

to administer the Retirement System.

“Compensation” shall mean all salaries and wages prior to any reduction pursuant to sections 125, 401(k), 403(b), 414(h)(2), and 457 of the Internal Revenue Code, not including any terminal payments for unused sick leave, derived from public funds which
are earned by a member of the Retirement System for service as an employee or teacher in the unit of the Retirement System for which he is performing full-time work. In addition to the foregoing, “compensation” shall include:

Performance-based compensation (regardless of whether paid in a lump sum, in periodic installments, or on a monthly basis);

Conversion of additional benefits to salary (additional benefits such as health, life, or disability plans), so long as the benefits are other than mandated by State law or regulation;

Payment of tax consequences for benefits provided by the employer, so long as they constitute an adjustment or increase in salary and not a “reimbursement of expenses”;

Payout of vacation leave so long as such payouts are permitted by applicable law and regulation;

Employee contributions to eligible deferred compensation plans; and

Effective July 1, 2009, payment of military differential wages.

“Compensation” shall not include any payment, as determined by the Board of Trustees, for the reimbursement of expenses or payments for housing or any other allowances whether or not classified as salary and wages. “Compensation” includes all special
pay contribution of annual leave made to a 401(a) Special Pay Plan for the benefit of an employee. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, “compensation” shall not include:

Supplement/allowance provided to employee to purchase additional benefits such as health, life, or disability plans;

Travel supplement/allowance (nonaccountable allowance plans);

Employer contributions to eligible deferred compensation plans;

Employer-provided fringe benefits (additional benefits such as health, life, or disability plans);

Reimbursement of uninsured medical expenses;

Reimbursement of business expenses;

Reimbursement of moving expenses;

Reimbursement/payment of personal expenses;

Incentive payments for early retirement;

Bonuses paid incident to retirement;

10a. Local supplementation as authorized under

G.S. 7A-300.1

for Judicial Department employees;

Contract buyout/severance payments; and

Payouts for unused sick leave.

In the event an employer reports as “compensation” payments not specifically included or excluded as “compensation”, such payments shall be “compensation” for retirement purposes only if the employer pays the Retirement System the additional actuarial
liability created by such payments.

(7b) “Compliance investigation” means an independent review or examination by Retirement Systems Division staff or authorized representatives who are assisting the Retirement Systems Division staff of records, activities, actions, or decisions by employers
or other affiliated or associated entities having an impact on a Retirement System or benefits administered by the Board of Trustees. The purpose of a compliance investigation is to help detect errors and ensure compliance
and full accountability in the use of pension funds.

(7c) “Consumer Price Index” shall mean the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U), U.S. City Average, all items, not seasonally adjusted, standard reference base, as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the U.S. Department of Labor.

“Creditable service” shall mean the total of “prior service” plus “membership service” plus service, both noncontributory and purchased, for which credit is allowable as provided in

G.S. 135-4

. In no event, however, shall “creditable service” be deemed “membership service” for the purpose of determining eligibility for benefits accruing under this Chapter.

(8a) “Duly acknowledged” means notarized, including electronic notarization, or verified through an identity authentication service approved by the Department of State Treasurer.

“Earnable compensation” shall mean the full rate of the compensation that would be payable to a teacher or employee if he worked in full normal working time. In cases where compensation includes maintenance, the Board of Trustees shall fix the value of
that part of the compensation not paid in money.

“Employee” shall mean all full-time employees, agents or officers of the State of North Carolina or any of its departments, bureaus and institutions other than educational, whether such employees are elected, appointed or employed: Provided that the term
“employee” shall not include any person who is a member of the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System, any member of the General Assembly or any part-time or temporary employee. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, “employee”
shall include all employees of the General Assembly except participants in the Legislative Intern Program, pages, and beneficiaries in receipt of a monthly retirement allowance under this Chapter who are reemployed on a temporary
basis. “Employee” also includes any participant whose employment is interrupted by reason of service in the Uniformed Services, as that term is defined in section 4303(16) of the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights
Act, Public Law 103-353, if that participant was an employee at the time of the interruption; if the participant does not return immediately after that service to employment with a covered employer in this System, then the participant
shall be deemed “in service” until the date on which the participant was first eligible to be separated or released from his or her involuntary military service. In all cases of doubt, the Board of Trustees shall determine whether
any person is an employee as defined in this Chapter. “Employee” shall also mean every full-time civilian employee of the North Carolina National Guard who is employed pursuant to section 709 of Title 32 of the United States Code
and paid from federal appropriated funds, but held by the federal authorities not to be a federal employee: Provided, however, that the authority or agency paying the salaries of such employees shall deduct or cause to be deducted
from each employee’s salary the employee’s contribution in accordance with applicable provisions of

G.S. 135-8

and remit the same, either directly or indirectly, to the Retirement System; coverage of employees described in this sentence shall commence upon the first day of the calendar year or fiscal year, whichever is earlier,
next following the date of execution of an agreement between the Secretary of Defense of the United States and the Adjutant General of the State acting for the Governor in behalf of the State, but no credit shall be allowed pursuant
to this sentence for any service previously rendered in the above-described capacity as a civilian employee of the North Carolina National Guard: Provided, further, that the Adjutant General, in the Adjutant General’s discretion,
may terminate the Retirement System coverage of the above-described North Carolina National Guard employees if a federal retirement system is established for such employees and the Adjutant General elects to secure coverage of
such employees under such federal retirement system. Any full-time civilian employee of the North Carolina National Guard described above who is now or hereafter may become a member of the Retirement System may secure Retirement
System credit for such service as a North Carolina National Guard civilian employee for the period preceding the time when such employees became eligible for Retirement System coverage by paying to the Retirement System an amount
equal to that which would have constituted employee contributions if the employee had been a member during the years of ineligibility, plus interest. Employees of State agencies, departments, institutions, boards, and commissions
who are employed in permanent job positions on a recurring basis must work at least 30 hours per week for nine or more months per calendar year in order to be covered by the provisions of this subdivision. On and after August 1,
2001, a person who is a nonimmigrant alien and who otherwise meets the requirements of this subdivision shall not be excluded from the definition of “employee” solely because the person holds a temporary or time-limited visa.

“Employer” shall mean the State of North Carolina, the county board of education, the city board of education, the State Board of Education, the board of trustees of the University of North Carolina, the board of trustees of other institutions and agencies
supported and under the control of the State, or any other agency of and within the State by which a teacher or other employee is paid. For purposes of reporting under the pronouncements by the Governmental Accounting Standards
Board, the Retirement System is a multi-employer plan.

(11a)
“Filing” when used in reference to an application for retirement shall mean the receipt of an acceptable application on a form provided by the Retirement System.

(11b)
“Fraud investigation” means an independent review or examination by Retirement Systems Division staff or authorized representatives who are assisting the Retirement Systems Division staff of records, activities,
actions, or decisions by employers or other affiliated or associated entities having an impact on the Retirement System. The purpose of a fraud investigation is to help detect and prevent fraud and to ensure full accountability
in the use of pension funds.

(11c)
“Law-Enforcement Officer” means a full-time paid employee of an employer who is actively serving in a position with assigned primary duties and responsibilities for prevention and detection of crime or the general
enforcement of the criminal laws of the State of North Carolina or serving civil processes, and who possesses the power of arrest by virtue of an oath administered under the authority of the State. “Law-Enforcement Officer”
also means a probation/parole officer as defined in this section with respect to any service rendered on or after July 1, 2017.

“Medical board” shall mean the board of physicians provided for in

G.S. 135-6

.

“Member” shall mean any teacher or State employee included in the membership of the System as provided in

G.S. 135-3

and 135-4.

“Membership service” shall mean service as a teacher or State employee rendered while a member of the Retirement System or membership service in a North Carolina Retirement System that has been transferred into this system.

“Pension reserve” shall mean the present value of all payments to be made on account of any pension or benefit in lieu of any pension computed upon the basis of such mortality tables as shall be adopted by the Board of Trustees, and regular interest.

“Pensions” shall mean payments for life derived from money provided by the State of North Carolina, and by county or city boards of education. All pensions shall be payable in equal monthly installments.

“Prior service” shall mean service rendered prior to the date of establishment of the Retirement System for which credit is allowable under

G.S. 135-4

; provided, persons now employed by the Board of Transportation shall be entitled to credit for employment in road maintenance by the various counties and road districts prior to 1931.

(17a) “Probation/Parole Officer” shall mean a full-time paid employee of the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction whose duties include supervising, evaluating, or otherwise instructing offenders who have
been placed on probation, parole, or post-release supervision or have been assigned to any other community-based program operated by the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry.

“Public school” shall mean any day school conducted within the State under the authority and supervision of a duly elected or appointed city or county school board, and any educational institution supported by and under the control of the State.

“Regular interest” shall mean interest compounded annually at such a rate as shall be determined by the Board of Trustees in accordance with

G.S. 135-7

, subsection (b).

“Retirement” under this Chapter, except as otherwise provided, means the commencement of monthly retirement benefits along with termination of employment and the complete separation from active service with no intent or agreement, express or implied,
to return to service. A retirement allowance under the provisions of this Chapter may only be granted upon retirement of a member. In order for a member’s retirement to become effective in any month, the member must perform no
work for an employer, including part-time, temporary, substitute, or contractor work, at any time during the six months immediately following the effective date of retirement. A member who is a full-time faculty member of The University
of North Carolina may effect a retirement allowance under this Chapter, notwithstanding the six-month requirement above, provided the member immediately enters the University’s Phased Retirement Program for Tenured Faculty as that
program existed on May 25, 2011. For purposes of this subdivision, all of the following shall not be considered service or work:

Serving as an unpaid bona fide volunteer in a local school administrative unit.

Serving as an unpaid bona fide volunteer guardian ad litem in the guardian ad litem program.

Serving on an authority, board, commission, committee, council, or other body of the State or of one or more counties, cities, local school administrative units, community colleges, constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina, or other
political subdivisions or public corporations in the State, that is authorized to function as legislative, policy-making, quasi-judicial, administrative, or advisory body in a position that does not require membership in
the Retirement System.

Volunteering in a position normally designated as an unpaid bona fide volunteer position.

“Retirement allowance” shall mean the sum of the “annuity and the pensions,” or any optional benefit payable in lieu thereof.

“Retirement System” shall mean the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System of North Carolina as defined in

G.S. 135-2

.

“Service” shall mean service as a teacher or State employee as described in subdivision (10) or (25) of this section.

“Social security breakpoint” shall mean the maximum amount of taxable wages under the Federal Insurance Contributions Act as from time to time in effect.

“Teacher” shall mean (i) any teacher, helping teacher, teacher in a job-sharing position under

G.S. 115C-326.5

except for a beneficiary in that position, librarian, principal, supervisor, superintendent of public schools or any full-time employee, city or county, superintendent of public instruction, or any full-time employee
of the Department of Public Instruction, president, dean or teacher, or any full-time employee in any educational institution supported by and under the control of the State; (ii) who works at least 30 or more hours per week for
at least nine or more months per calendar year: Provided, that the term “teacher” shall not include any part-time, temporary, or substitute teacher or employee except for a teacher in a job-sharing position, and shall not include
those participating in an optional retirement program provided for in

G.S. 135-5.1

or

G.S. 135-5.4

. In all cases of doubt, the Board of Trustees, hereinbefore defined, shall determine whether any person is a teacher as defined in this Chapter. On and after August 1, 2001, a person who is a nonimmigrant alien
and who otherwise meets the requirements of this subdivision shall not be excluded from the definition of “teacher” solely because the person holds a temporary or time-limited visa. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the term “teacher”
shall not include any nonimmigrant alien employed in elementary or secondary public schools (whether employed in a full-time, part-time, temporary, permanent, or substitute teacher position) and participating in an exchange visitor
program designated by the United States Department of State pursuant to 22 C.F.R. Part 62 or by the United States Department of Homeland Security pursuant to 8 C.F.R. Part 214.2(q).

“Year” as used in this Article shall mean the regular fiscal year beginning July 1 and ending June 30 in the following calendar year unless otherwise defined by regulation of the Board of Trustees.

History.
1941, c. 25, s. 1; 1943, c. 431; 1945, c. 924; 1947, c. 458, s. 6; 1953, c. 1053; 1955, c. 818; c. 1155, s. 81/2; 1959, c. 513, s. 1; c. 1263, s. 1; 1963, c. 687, s. 1; 1965, c. 750; c. 780, s. 1; 1969, c. 44, s. 74; c.
1223, s. 16; c. 1227; 1971, c. 117, ss. 1-5; c. 338, s. 1; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; c. 640, s. 2; c. 1233; 1975, c. 475, s. 1; 1977, c. 574, s. 1; 1979, c. 972, s. 1; 1981, c. 557, ss. 1, 2; 1983, c. 412, ss. 1, 2; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984),
c. 1034, s. 227; 1985, c. 649, s. 3; 1987, c. 738, ss. 29(a), 36(a); 1991, c. 51, s. 2; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 7.31(c); 1998-1, s. 4(g); 2001-424, s. 32.24(b); 2001-426, ss. 2, 3; 2001-513, s. 24; 2002-110, s. 1; 2002-126,
ss. 28.6(b), 28.12(a); 2002-174, s. 2; 2003-359, ss. 1, 2; 2004-81, s. 1; 2004-199, s. 34(a); 2005-276, s. 29.28(e); 2006-66, s. 22.21; 2007-143, s. 1; 2009-11, s. 1; 2009-66, s. 6(e), (i); 2009-281, s. 1; 2009-451, s. 26.22; 2010-31,
s. 29.7(d); 2011-145, s. 29.24(b); 2011-183, s. 100; 2012-130, s. 6; 2012-185, s. 2(b); 2013-288, ss. 3(a), 4(a); 2013-291, s. 1; 2014-97, s. 4(a); 2015-67, s. 1; 2015-164, s. 4; 2017-57, s. 35.19B(a); 2017-125, s. 1(a); 2017-128,
s. 1(a)-(c); 2017-129, s. 4(a); 2017-186, s. 3(a); 2018-85, s. 10; 2019-110, s. 3; 2020-48, s. 1.1(b); 2021-72, s. 2.1(a); 2021-75, s. 3.1(b); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(t), (u).

Cross References.

For the Legislative Actuarial Note Act, see

G.S. 120-112

et seq.

Open Enrollment — Contributory Death Benefit.

Session Laws 2007-388, s. 1, provides: “Notwithstanding any section of law or any rules and regulations adopted by the Boards of Trustees to the contrary, the Retirement Systems Division of the Department of State Treasurer shall allow for an open enrollment
period in the Contributory Death Benefit for Retired Members of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System, and the Legislative
Retirement System. This open enrollment period shall begin February 1, 2008, and end May 31, 2008. The Retirement Systems Division shall send notice by U.S. mail of the open enrollment period to all retirees who elected not to be covered
under this benefit or who failed to make any election at the time of their retirement and shall send a second notice by U.S. mail to any such retiree who fails to make an election within 60 days of the notification of the open enrollment
period. Notice, at minimum, shall consist of notification of the open enrollment period and the consequences of failure to respond within the specified time frames, informational materials explaining the benefit program and the associated
costs, and a preprinted personalized enrollment application to facilitate the enrollment process indicating each individual retiree’s contribution rate. The contribution rate for retirees electing coverage during the open enrollment
period shall be increased by eleven and one-tenth percent (11.1%) the rate established for retirees who elected coverage when first eligible, at retirement. For retirees electing coverage during this open enrollment period, coverage
shall become effective the first of the month following the month in which the election of coverage is received by the Retirement Systems Division but not before February 1, 2008. Contribution rates for coverage shall be based upon
the retiree’s nearest age as of the effective date of coverage and shall begin by deduction from the retiree’s net monthly retirement allowance in the month in which coverage becomes effective. Coverage elected by retirees during this
open enrollment period shall be subject to all other laws and rules and regulations adopted by the Board of Trustees governing the Contributory Death Benefit for Retired Members.”

Third Grade Read to Achieve Teacher Bonus Program.
Session Laws 2016-94, s. 9.7(a)-(e), as amended by Session Laws 2017-57, s. 8.8B(c), provides: “(a) The State Board of Education shall establish the Third Grade Read to Achieve Teacher Bonus Program (program) to reward teacher
performance and encourage student learning and improvement. To attain this goal, the Department of Public Instruction shall administer bonus pay to teachers who have an Education Value-Added Assessment System (EVAAS) student growth
index score for third grade reading from the previous school year, beginning with the data from the 2015-2016 school year, as follows:

“(1) Of the funds appropriated for the program, five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be allocated for bonuses to teachers who are in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the State according to the EVAAS student growth index score for third
grade reading from the previous year. These funds shall be allocated equally among qualifying teachers.

“(2) Of the funds appropriated for the program, five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be allocated to pay bonuses to teachers who are in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in their respective local school administrative units according to
the EVAAS student growth index score for third grade reading from the previous year. These funds shall be split proportionally based on average daily membership for each local school administrative unit and then distributed equally
among qualifying teachers in each local school administrative unit, subject to the following conditions:

“a. Teachers employed in charter schools and regional schools are not eligible to receive a bonus under this subdivision.

“b. Any teacher working in a local school administrative unit that employs three or fewer third grade teachers shall receive a bonus under this subdivision if that teacher has an EVAAS student growth index score for third grade reading from the previous
school year that exceeds expected growth.

“(3) For EVAAS student growth index score data collected during the 2015-2016 school year and the 2016-2017 school year, bonuses awarded pursuant to subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection are payable in January of 2017 and January of 2018, respectively,
to qualifying teachers who remain employed teaching in the same local school administrative unit at least from the school year the data is collected until the corresponding school year that the bonus is paid.

“(4) A teacher who is eligible to receive a bonus under both subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection shall receive both bonuses. The bonus or bonuses awarded to a teacher pursuant to this subsection shall be in addition to any regular wage or other
bonus the teacher receives or is scheduled to receive.

“(b) Notwithstanding G.S. 135-1(7a), the compensation bonuses awarded by this section are not compensation under Article 1 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes, the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System.

“(c) The State Board of Education shall study the effect of the program on teacher performance and retention. The State Board shall report the results of its findings, the distribution of statewide bonuses as among local school administrative units, and
the distribution of bonuses within local school administrative units as among individual schools to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee,
and the Fiscal Research Division on March 15 of each year.

“(d) For the 2017-2018 fiscal year only, the Director of the Budget shall also include in the Base Budget, as defined by G.S. 143C-1-1(d)(1c), the amount of nonrecurring funds needed to support the program.

“(e) This section expires June 30, 2018.”

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 8.8C(a)-(d), as amended by Session Laws 2017-197, s. 2.10(b), and as amended by Session Laws 2018-5, s. 8.10(d), provides: “(a) It is the intent of the State to reward teacher performance and encourage student learning and improvement.
To attain this goal, the Department of Public Instruction shall administer the Third Grade Read to Achieve Teacher Bonus Program (program) to qualifying teachers who have an Education Value-Added Assessment System (EVAAS) student growth
index score for third grade reading from the previous school year, as follows:

“(1) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

“a. Eligible Teacher. — A teacher who meets one or both of the following criteria:

“1. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the State according to the EVAAS student growth index score for third grade reading from the previous school year.

“2. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the teacher’s respective local school administrative unit according to the EVAAS student growth index score for third grade reading from the previous school year.

“b. Qualifying Teacher. — An eligible teacher who remains teaching in the same local school administrative unit or, if the teacher is not employed in a local school administrative unit, remains teaching in the same school at least from the school year
the data for the EVAAS student growth index score for third grade reading is collected until January 1 of the school year a bonus provided under this subsection is paid.

“(2) Of the funds appropriated for this program, the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be allocated for bonuses to eligible teachers under sub-sub-subdivision (1)a.1. of this subsection. Funds appropriated for this purpose shall be distributed
equally among qualifying teachers.

“(3) Of the funds appropriated for this program, the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be allocated for bonuses to eligible teachers under sub-sub-subdivision (1)a.2. of this subsection. Funds allocated for this bonus shall be divided proportionally
based on average daily membership in third grade for each local school administrative unit and then distributed equally among qualifying teachers in each local school administrative unit, subject to the following conditions:

“a. Teachers employed in charter schools, regional schools, and University of North Carolina laboratory schools are not eligible to receive a bonus under this subdivision.

“b. Any qualifying teacher who taught in a local school administrative unit that employed in the previous school year three or fewer total third grade teachers shall receive a bonus under this subdivision if that teacher has an EVAAS student growth index
score for third grade reading from the previous school year of exceeded expected growth.

“(4) Bonuses awarded pursuant to subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection are payable in January to qualifying teachers based on EVAAS student growth index score data from the previous school year.

“(5) A qualifying teacher may receive a bonus under both subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection.

“(6) The bonus or bonuses awarded to a qualifying teacher pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any regular wage or other bonus the teacher receives or is scheduled to receive.

“(7) A bonus awarded pursuant to either subdivision (2) or subdivision (3) of this subsection shall not exceed three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) in any given school year. No teacher shall receive more than seven thousand dollars ($7,000) in
total bonus compensation for any given school year.

“(b) Notwithstanding G.S. 135-1(7a), the bonuses awarded by this section are not compensation under Article 1 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes, the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System.

“(c) The State Board of Education shall study the effect of the bonuses awarded pursuant to this section and Section 9.7 of S.L. 2016-94, as amended by Section 8.8B of this act, on teacher performance and retention. The State Board shall report the results
of its findings, the distribution of statewide bonuses as among local school administrative units, and the distribution of bonuses within local school administrative units as among individual schools to the President Pro Tempore of
the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee, and the Fiscal Research Division by March 15 of each year.

“(d) This section applies for bonuses awarded in January 2019 and 2020, based on data from the 2017-2018 and 2018-2019 school years, respectively.”

Advanced Placement/International Baccalaureate/Cambridge AICE Teacher Bonus Program.
Session Laws 2016-94, s. 8.8, as amended by Session Laws 2017-57, s. 8.8B(a), as amended by Session Laws 2017-197, s. 2.10(a), and as amended by Session Laws 2018-5, s. 8.10(a), (b), provides: “(a) The State Board of Education
shall establish the Advanced Placement/International Baccalaureate/Cambridge AICE Program (program) to reward advanced course teacher performance and to encourage student learning and improvement. To attain this goal, the Department
of Public Instruction shall administer bonus pay to teachers of advanced courses in public schools, including charter schools, beginning with data from the 2015-2016 school year, in accordance with the following:

“(1) A bonus in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each student taught by an advanced course teacher in each advanced course who receives the following score:

“a. For Advanced Placement courses, a score of three or higher on the College Board Advanced Placement Examination.

“b. For International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme courses, a score of four or higher on the International Baccalaureate course examination.

“c. For the Cambridge Advanced International Certificate of Education (AICE) program, a score of ‘C’ or higher on the Cambridge AICE program examinations.

“(2) No teacher shall be awarded a bonus pursuant to this subsection that exceeds three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) in any given school year. The bonus awarded to a teacher pursuant to this subsection shall be in addition to any regular wage
or other bonus the teacher receives or is scheduled to receive.

“(3) A bonus awarded pursuant to this subsection is payable in January, based on data from the previous school year, to a qualifying teacher who remains employed teaching in the same local school administrative unit or, if the teacher is not employed
in a local school administrative unit, remains teaching in the same charter school at least from the school year the data is collected until January 1 of the corresponding school year that the bonus is paid.

“(b) For the purposes of this section, an ‘advanced course’ shall mean an Advanced Placement course, an International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme course, or a Cambridge AICE course.

“(c) Notwithstanding G.S. 135-1(7a), the compensation bonuses awarded under this section are not compensation under Article 1 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes, the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System.

“(d) Subsections (a) and (b) of this section apply for bonuses awarded in January 2018, 2019, and 2020, based on data from the 2016-2017, 2017-2018, and 2018-2019 school years, respectively. Subsection (c) of this section applies only for bonuses awarded
in January 2018, based on data from the 2016-2017 school year.

“(e) For the 2017-2018 fiscal year only, the Director of the Budget shall also include in the base budget, as defined by G.S. 143C-1-1(d)(1c), the amount of nonrecurring funds needed to support the program.

“(f) Repealed by Session Laws 2017-57, s. 8.8B(a), effective July 1, 2017.”

Industry Certifications and Credentials Teacher Bonus Program. Session Laws 2016-94, s. 8.9, as amended by Session Laws 2017-57, s. 8.8B(b), and as amended by Session Laws 2018-5, s. 8.10(c), provides: “(a) The State Board of Education, in collaboration
with the Department of Commerce, shall establish the Industry Certifications and Credentials Teacher Bonus Program (program) to reward the performance of teachers in public schools, including charter schools, who teach students earning
approved industry certifications or credentials consistent with

G.S. 115C-156.2

and to encourage student learning and improvement. To attain this goal, the Department of Public Instruction shall administer bonus pay to teachers in public schools, including charter schools, who teach students earning
approved industry certifications or credentials, beginning with data from the 2015-2016 school year, in accordance with the following:

“(1) For teachers who provide direct instruction to students, bonuses shall be provided in the following amounts:

“a. A bonus in the amount of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each student taught by a teacher who provided instruction in a course that led to the attainment of an industry certification or credential with a twenty-five-dollar ($25.00) value ranking
as determined under subdivision (3) of this subsection.

“b. A bonus in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each student taught by a teacher who provided instruction in a course that led to the attainment of an industry certification or credential with a fifty-dollar ($50.00) value ranking as determined
under subdivision (3) of this subsection.

“(2) No teacher shall be awarded a bonus pursuant to this subsection that exceeds three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) in any given school year. The bonus awarded to a teacher pursuant to this subsection shall be in addition to any regular wage
or other bonus the teacher receives or is scheduled to receive.

“(3) The Department of Commerce, in consultation with the State Board, shall assign a value ranking for each industry certification and credential based on academic rigor and employment value in accordance with this subdivision. Fifty percent (50%) of
the ranking shall be based on academic rigor and the remaining fifty percent (50%) on employment value. Academic rigor and employment value shall be based on the following elements:

“a. Academic rigor shall be based on the number of instructional hours, including work experience or internship hours, required to earn the industry certification or credential, with extra weight given for coursework that also provides community college
credit.

“b. Employment value shall be based on the entry wage, growth rate in employment for each occupational category, and average annual openings for the primary occupation linked with the industry certification or credential.

“(4) A bonus awarded pursuant to this subsection is payable in January to a qualifying teacher who remains employed teaching in the same local school administrative unit or, if the teacher is not employed in a local school administrative unit, remains
teaching in the same charter school at least from the school year the data is collected until January 1 of the corresponding school year that the bonus is paid.

“(b) Notwithstanding G.S. 135-1(7a), the compensation bonuses awarded under this section are not compensation under Article 1 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes, the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System.

“(c) The State Board of Education shall study the effect of the program on teacher performance and retention. The State Board shall report the results of its findings, the amount of bonuses awarded to teachers who teach students earning approved industry
certifications or credentials, and the type of industry certifications and credentials earned by their students to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Joint Legislative Education
Oversight Committee, and the Fiscal Research Division by March 15 of each year.

“(d) For the 2017-2018 fiscal year only, the Director of the Budget shall also include in the base budget, as defined by G.S. 143C-1-1(d)(1c), the amount of nonrecurring funds needed to support the program.

“(e) Repealed by Session Laws 2017-57, s. 8.8B(b), effective July 1, 2017.”

Fourth and Fifth Grade Reading Teacher Bonus Program for 2017-2018.
Session Laws 2017-57, s. 8.8D(a)-(d), as amended by Session Laws 2018-5, s. 8.11(a), provides: “(a) It is the intent of the State to reward teacher performance and encourage student learning and improvement. To attain this
goal, the Department of Public Instruction shall administer the Fourth and Fifth Grade Reading Teacher Bonus Program (program) to qualifying teachers who have an Education Value-Added Assessment System (EVAAS) student growth index
score for fourth or fifth grade reading from the previous school year, as follows:

“(1) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

“a. Eligible Teacher. — A teacher who meets one or both of the following criteria:

“1. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the State according to the EVAAS student growth index score for fourth or fifth grade reading from the previous school year.
